District of Columbia statutes.
47-1035

The American Legion; lot 32 and 33 in square 185 and lot 01 in square 763.

The property situated in square 185 in the City of Washington, District of Columbia, described as lots 32 and 33, owned, occupied, and used by the American Legion, and the property situated in square 763 in the District of Columbia, described as lot 01, owned, occupied, and used by the Kenneth H. Nash Post #8 American Legion, are hereby exempt from all taxation so long as these same properties continue to be so owned and occupied, and not used for commercial purposes, subject to the provisions of § 47-1002, providing for exemptions of church and school properties.

June 13, 1934, 48 Stat. 953, ch. 493
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Oct. 16, 1998, D.C. Law 12-168, § 2, 45 DCR 5185
1973 Ed., § 47-828.
1981 Ed., § 47-1035.